build/hi_desktop/english.lexc
!!!english.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols [stem] +V +Sg +Pl +PREP +DET +PRON +3sg +Aux +wh

LEXICON Root

Verb ;
Preposition ;
Determiner ;
Pronoun ;

LEXICON Verb

call Vinf;
list Vinf;
be[stem]+V+3sg+Aux:is #;

LEXICON Vinf

[stem]+V:0 #;

LEXICON Preposition

with Pinf;

LEXICON Pinf

[stem]+PREP:0 #;

LEXICON Determiner

the[stem]+DET:the #;

LEXICON Pronoun

when Pron;

LEXICON Pron

[stem]+PRON+wh:0 #;
